Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-252
Formation; constitution; bylaws.

A county agricultural society shall adopt a constitution and bylaws and may, upon approval of its board of directors, file articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State pursuant to the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act. Any agricultural society forming itself as a nonprofit corporation shall incorporate as a public benefit corporation as defined in section 21-1914.

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 3.

Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, see section 21-1901.